Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; VETERANS PROGRAMMING.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to the YMCA of the North to support and reinforce work in three service areas: Military and Veteran Family Retreats, Military Child BOLD and GOLD Outdoor Leadership Program, and Military and Veteran Service Program Discounts. new text end